Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 13 Teachers’ Tenure

16-13-1.
“Teacher” defined.

The term “teacher” as used in this chapter means every person for whose position a certificate issued by the department of elementary and secondary education is required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-13-1

.

16-13-2.
Annual contract basis — Automatic continuation.

Teaching service shall be on the basis of an annual contract, except as hereinafter provided, and the contract shall be deemed to be continuous unless the governing body of the schools shall notify the teacher, in writing, on or before March 1, that the contract for the ensuing year will not be renewed. If the dismissal or nonrenewal is based on fiscal exigency or program reorganization, the governing body shall notify the teacher on or before June 1 of the school year immediately preceding the school year in which the dismissal or nonrenewal is to become effective. Provided, however, that a teacher, upon request, shall be furnished a statement of cause for dismissal or nonrenewal of his or her contract by the school committee; provided further, that whenever any contract is not renewed, or the teacher is dismissed, the teacher shall be entitled to a hearing and appeal pursuant to the procedure set forth in §

16-13-4

.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or at any time to have prohibited, a school committee from agreeing, in a collective bargaining agreement, to the arbitration of disputes arising out of a dismissal or nonrenewal of a nontenured teacher pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-13-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 222, § 1; 1995, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 335, § 1.

16-13-3.
Probationary period — Tenure after probation.

Three (3) annual contracts within five (5) successive school years shall be considered evidence of satisfactory teaching and shall constitute a probationary period. Teachers who complete the probationary period shall be considered in continuous service and shall not be subject to annual renewal or nonrenewal of their contracts. No tenured teacher in continuous service shall be dismissed except for good and just cause. Whenever a tenured teacher in continuous service is to be dismissed, the notice of the dismissal shall be given to the teacher, in writing, on or before March 1 of the school year immediately preceding the school year in which the dismissal is to become effective. If the dismissal is based on fiscal exigency or program reorganization, the notice of dismissal shall be given to the teacher, in writing, on or before June 1 of the school year immediately preceding the school year in which the dismissal is to become effective. The teacher shall be furnished with a complete statement of the cause(s) for the dismissal by the governing body of the school and shall be entitled to a hearing and appeal pursuant to the procedure set forth in §

16-13-4

.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or at any time to have prohibited, a school committee from agreeing, in a collective bargaining agreement, to the arbitration of disputes arising out of the dismissal of a tenured teacher pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Any teacher employed by a local or regional school committee who has attained tenure in a Rhode Island public school system; who is appointed to an administrative position of principal, assistant principal, vice principal, superintendent, assistant superintendent, director, or other central office personnel in any Rhode Island public school system, including the original school district of employment; or who is hired for an administrative position as a fellow, education specialist, or director by the Rhode Island department of education, shall be granted an unpaid leave of absence, not to exceed three (3) years, in order to be employed in an administrative position of principal, assistant principal, vice principal, superintendent, assistant superintendent, director, or other central office personnel in any Rhode Island school system or the Rhode Island department of education. Said teachers shall, upon completion of their administrative position employment contract, or termination or resignation of the administrative position, be allowed to return to his or her former status as a tenured teacher within the system from which the leave of absence was taken. Such leaves of absence shall not be deemed to be an interruption of service for the purposes of seniority and teacher retirement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-13-3

; P.L. 1975, ch. 258, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 267, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 335, § 1.

16-13-4.
Statement of cause for dismissal — Hearing — Appeals — Arbitration.

The statement of cause for dismissal shall be given to the teacher, in writing, by the governing body of the schools. The teacher may, within fifteen (15) days of the notification, request, in writing, a hearing before the school committee or school board. The hearing shall be public or private, in the discretion of the teacher. Both teacher and school board shall be entitled to be represented by counsel and to present witnesses. The board shall keep a complete record of the hearing and shall furnish the teacher with a copy. Any teacher aggrieved by the decision of the school board shall have the right of appeal to the department of elementary and secondary education and shall have the right of further appeal to the superior court. Any decisions rendered must be approved by a majority of the full board. Members voting on a decision must have been in attendance at the hearing.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or at any time to have prohibited, a school committee in a municipality or regional school district with an elected school committee, or the chief executive officer in a municipality with an appointed school committee from agreeing, in a collective bargaining agreement, to the arbitration of disputes arising out of the nonrenewal, dismissal, and/or suspension of a teacher pursuant to §§

16-13-2

,

16-13-3

, and/or

16-13-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-13-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 20, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 131, § 1.

16-13-5.
Suspension for cause — Payment for period suspended.

Section

16-13-4

shall not prevent the suspension of a teacher for good and just cause. Prior to the suspension of a teacher as provided in this section, the school committee shall hold a pre-suspension hearing to determine if a suspension is warranted, and at the pre-suspension hearing, shall consider any available evidence and afford the teacher or his or her counsel an opportunity to respond to that evidence. In the event a teacher is suspended or otherwise not permitted to perform his or her duties prior to the presuspension hearing, then the teacher shall be paid his or her regular salary during that period.

Whenever a teacher is suspended by a school committee, the school committee shall furnish the teacher with a complete statement of the cause(s) of the suspension and, upon request, shall afford the teacher a hearing and appeal pursuant to the procedure set forth in §

16-13-4

. If the teacher shall be vindicated as a result of the hearing or any appeal the teacher shall be paid in full for the period of suspension, and provided further, that during the period of suspension, all medical and insurance benefits shall remain in full force and effect.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit or at any time to have prohibited a school committee in a municipality or regional school district with an elected school committee, or the chief executive officer in a municipality with an appointed school committee, from agreeing, in a collective bargaining agreement, to the arbitration of disputes arising out of the suspension of a teacher pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-3-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 357, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 265, § 5.

16-13-6.
Suspension because of decrease in school population — Seniority — Reinstatement.

A school board may, by reason of a substantial decrease of pupil population within its school system, suspend teachers in numbers necessitated by the decrease in pupil population; provided, however, that suspension of teachers shall be in the inverse order of their employment unless it is necessary to retain certain teachers of technical subjects whose places cannot be filled by teachers of earlier appointment; and, provided further, that teachers who are suspended shall be reinstated in the inverse order of their suspension. No new appointments shall be made while there are available teachers so suspended.

Notice of suspension under this section and §

16-13-5

shall be given, in writing, by the governing body of schools on or before June 1 notifying the teacher that his or her employment for the ensuing year shall be suspended, provided however, notice by that date need not be provided in the instance of an emergency performance-related cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-13-6

; P.L. 1992, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 335, § 1.

16-13-7.
Continuity unimpaired by military service.

Absence from teaching because of serving one’s country shall not impair the continuing service status.

History of Section.

P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-13-7

.

16-13-8.
Continuity of tenure upon transfer.

Any teacher in continuing service who voluntarily resigns and transfers to another community in Rhode Island without interrupting his or her professional career, shall be considered to remain under tenure unless the teacher is notified to the contrary, in writing, prior to March 1 of the second school year in which the teacher transfers. If the dismissal or nonrenewal is based on fiscal exigency or program reorganization, the teacher shall be notified, in writing, prior to June 1 of the second (2nd) school year in which the teacher transfers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

16-13-8

; P.L. 1964, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 335, § 1.

16-13-9.
Termination for cause — List maintained.

Whenever a tenured teacher is terminated for good and just cause pursuant to §

16-13-3

by a school committee or the governing body of a charter or private school, the school committee or the governing body of the charter or private school shall, within sixty (60) days of the termination or in cases where the termination is appealed, within sixty (60) days after the conclusion of the appeal filed by the terminated tenured teacher when the termination is upheld, furnish the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education with the identity of the terminated teacher. Provided, this section shall not apply to:

The nonrenewal of a contract of a nontenured teacher pursuant to §

16-13-2

; or

The termination of a tenured teacher due to fiscal exigency or program reorganization.

The department shall maintain a list of those teachers who have been terminated for good and just cause (the “list”) and shall update the list monthly to include the names of any additional teachers submitted by a school committee or the governing body of a charter or private school pursuant to the provisions of this section. This list of terminated teachers shall be accessible only to the hiring authority of any private, parochial, charter, or public school.

The list of terminated teachers shall not be a public record pursuant to the “access to public records act” (APRA) set forth in chapter 2 of title 38. This section shall not abrogate or modify any existing statutory or common law privileges or immunities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 418, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 419, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.